Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Retirement Benefits, Disability Benefits,
and Spouses’ Benefits

47-14-70.
Eligibility for retirement benefits; additional or partial retirement benefits; election of spousal benefits.

A member with at least 20 years of service shall receive retirement benefits of $1,700.00 per month upon retirement, provided that at least 12 years of such service shall have been served as a clerk, and the member must have served continuously as a clerk for the four years immediately preceding the member’s retirement. Subject to the restrictions set out in this subsection, in computing such service, a member also may include service as a deputy clerk of the superior court and not more than four years of service as a member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty during any period of time in which the United States was engaged in an armed conflict, regardless of whether a state of war had been declared by Congress, provided that no service as a member of the armed forces of the United States shall be deemed as service for purposes of obtaining retirement benefits under this chapter if such service has or will be used in the determination of the member’s eligibility for retirement benefits or allowances from any other state or federal retirement program, excluding social security. A clerk of the superior court may not include service for eligibility purposes for years in which the clerk has not completed the training requirements set out in paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 15-6-50. No member who is subject to the provisions of Code Section 15-6-50 shall be entitled to include, for purposes of eligibility to receive a benefit under this chapter, service during which he or she was not in compliance with the training requirements of subsection (c) of such Code section.

If a member is eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this Code section but does not retire and continues to serve as clerk, he or she shall be entitled to receive, upon retirement, the amount to which he or she would have been entitled under subsection (a) of this Code section; and, in addition, for each year of service beyond the required 20 years, he or she shall receive an additional 5 percent of the amount he or she would be entitled to under subsection (a) of this Code section.

In lieu of the retirement benefits provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a member, upon retirement, may elect spousal benefits. If such election is made, then the amount of the benefits paid to the member shall be computed so as to be actuarially equivalent to the monthly retirement payment which would have been paid to the member under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, as applicable. Such actuarial equivalence shall be computed on the interest rate and mortality basis approved from time to time by the board, the age of the member, and, if applicable, the age of his or her spouse as of the date benefits are to commence. After the member’s death, the member’s surviving spouse shall receive a monthly sum during the lifetime of the surviving spouse equal to 50 percent of the amount which the member would have received had the member elected the full benefits provided under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. In order to be eligible for such benefits, the surviving spouse shall have been married to the member for at least six years immediately preceding the member’s death. Such benefits shall not commence until after the surviving spouse reaches 55 years of age.

If a member elects spousal benefits under paragraph (1) of this subsection and subsequently the member’s spouse predeceases the member or a final judgment of complete divorce between the member and the member’s spouse is entered, the member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke the election for spousal benefits under paragraph (1) of this subsection and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the first day of the month following the date on which the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such date.

A member with at least 16 years of service either as a clerk or deputy clerk shall receive retirement benefits of $1,360.00 per month upon retirement, provided that at least eight years of such service shall have been served as a clerk, and the member must have served continuously as a clerk for the four years immediately preceding the member’s retirement. No other type of service shall be counted toward such retirement benefits.

A member with at least 12 years of service either as a clerk or deputy clerk shall receive retirement benefits of $1,020.00 per month upon retirement, provided that at least eight years of such service shall have been served as a clerk, and the member must have served continuously as a clerk for the four years immediately preceding the member’s retirement. No other type of service shall be counted toward such retirement benefits.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, all members who retire on or after April 1, 1976, for whatever reason and who otherwise meet the requirements for retirement benefits under either subsection (d) or (e) of this Code section shall be entitled to an additional benefit based on service in excess of the minimum required for such retirement benefits, provided that such service is of the kind for which credit toward retirement benefits would be given under subsection (d) or (e) of this Code section. The amount of the retirement benefit shall be based on the ratio that the total number of years served bears to the minimum number of years required for benefits under subsection (d) or (e) of this Code section, as appropriate. For example, the following table is illustrative of the additional benefits computation under this Code section:

Click to view

No person shall receive credit toward the retirement benefits set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section for any service performed after February 15, 1952, unless payment for the period covered by such service has been made to the board. No person shall be eligible for the benefits provided in this Code section unless his or her official duties have terminated and he or she files an application for benefits within 90 days, or as soon thereafter as possible, from the termination of his or her official duties.

Years of Service at Retirement Benefits Received 13 Thirteen-twelfths of the benefits provided in subsection (e) of this Code section 14 Fourteen-twelfths of the benefits provided in subsection (e) of this Code section 15 Fifteen-twelfths of the benefits provided in subsection (e) of this Code section 17 Seventeen-sixteenths of the benefits provided in subsection (d) of this Code section 18 Eighteen-sixteenths of the benefits provided in subsection (d) of this Code section 19 Nineteen-sixteenths of the benefits provided in subsection (d) of this Code section

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 230, § 9; Ga. L. 1964, p. 202, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 420, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 228, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 352, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1183, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 729, §§ 2, 4, 5, 8; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2069, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1547, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 857, §§ 2, 4, 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 921, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1252, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 626, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1270, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1811, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 6; Ga. L. 2014, p. 178, § 1/HB 580.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “In lieu of the retirement benefits provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, a member, upon retirement, may elect to receive 90 percent of the benefits the member is entitled to receive under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section during the remainder of the member’s life; and, after the member’s death, the member’s surviving spouse shall receive a monthly sum during the lifetime of the surviving spouse equal to 50 percent of the amount which the member would have received had the member elected the full benefits provided under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. In order to be eligible for such benefits, the surviving spouse must have been married to the member for at least six years immediately preceding the member’s death. Such benefits shall not commence until after the surviving spouse reaches 55 years of age.”

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-14-71.
Eligibility for disability benefits; determination of disability.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, a member may retire after completing 16 years of creditable service if the member becomes totally and permanently disabled after commencing service as a clerk. Any such clerk shall be entitled to receive retirement benefits in the amount of $1,700.00 per month. All questions relating to the degree and nature of the total and permanent disability suffered by the clerk shall be determined by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 202, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 729, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2069, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 857, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1252, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 626, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1270, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1811, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 5.

47-14-72.
Benefits payable in the event of death before retirement; rights of surviving spouse.

In the event of the death of any clerk who has not retired under any of the provisions of this chapter, but who was eligible to do so, the surviving spouse shall receive a monthly sum during his or her lifetime equal to 50 percent of the amount such clerk would have received had he or she retired under subsection (c) of Code Section 47-14-70. In order to receive such benefits, any such spouse must be at least 55 years of age and have been married to such clerk for at least six years immediately preceding the death of such clerk.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation that in the event of the death of any clerk who has satisfied all requirements for retirement provided by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-14-70 but who dies prior to attaining the age of 55, whether or not such clerk has terminated his or her official duties as clerk, the surviving spouse shall receive a monthly sum during his or her lifetime in an amount not greater than 50 percent of the amount such clerk would have received had he or she retired at age 55 as provided under subsection (c) of Code Section 47-14-70, the actual percent to be set by the board of commissioners in direct relation to the amount determined by the actuary pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. In order to receive such benefits, any such spouse must be at least 55 years of age and have been married to such clerk for at least six years immediately preceding the death of such clerk. Once funded and granted, such benefit shall be irrevocable but shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-14-90.

The board of commissioners shall be authorized to provide for such level of benefits as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection only upon:

The recommendation of the actuary for the board;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 202, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1547, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 722, § 4/SB 460; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 66/SB 436.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), substituted “such clerk” for “the clerk” at the end of the last sentence; and added subsection (b).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” in the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1) and near the beginning of paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-14-73.
Eligibility to retire and receive retirement benefits; effect of retirement before age 55.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a clerk may terminate his official duties as clerk and be eligible for retirement benefits if he has fulfilled the qualifications necessary therefor; but if he has not reached the age of 55 at the time he terminates his official duties, he shall not commence receiving his retirement benefits until he reaches that age.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 16; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 332, § 3.

47-14-74.
Application of certain increases in benefits to benefits paid to surviving spouses.

The increases in retirement benefits resulting from changes made in this chapter prior to January 1, 1998, and the increases in retirement benefits resulting from changes made in this chapter during calendar year 1998 shall also be used in the computation of any retirement benefits allowed a surviving spouse of a deceased clerk pursuant to the terms of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 729, § 7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2069, § 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 857, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1252, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 626, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1270, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1811, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 6.

47-14-75.
Eligibility for certain benefit increases.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, each member who retired prior to July 1, 1998, and all members who have ceased their service as clerks but have not yet reached retirement age shall receive benefits under this chapter in the same amount as a member with the same number of years of service would receive if such member retired on July 1, 1998. This Code section shall not reduce the amount of any benefits which a retired member or the spouse of a deceased member is receiving on June 30, 1998. The increased benefits provided by Code Section 47-14-71 and subsections (a), (d), and (e) of Code Section 47-14-70 shall be paid to retired members and spouses of deceased members, effective on July 1, 1998.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 729, § 9; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2069, § 7; Ga. L. 1981, p. 857, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 555, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1252, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 626, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1270, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1811, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 7.

47-14-76.
Right to withdraw dues; effect of withdrawal on membership and benefits; eligibility to rejoin the fund.

Any member may withdraw the total sum, without interest, which he has paid into the fund. In order to become eligible to rejoin the fund and to receive any benefits under this chapter after such withdrawal, he must repay the entire amount which he has withdrawn, plus interest at 6 percent per annum. A member shall not receive credit for any service after such withdrawal unless he pays the dues which he would have paid had he been a member of the fund during such period of service, plus interest on such amounts at 6 percent per annum. If any clerk dies before being retired, the total amount, without interest, which has been paid by him into the fund shall be paid to his estate. If, after retiring, any clerk should die without leaving a surviving spouse and without having received the amount in benefits equal to the amount which he had paid into the fund, the difference, without interest, shall be paid to his estate. If after retiring, any clerk should die leaving a surviving spouse and such surviving spouse should thereafter die without having received the amount of benefits equal to the amount which had been paid into the fund less the amount received by such clerk before his death, the difference, without interest, shall be paid to his estate.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 10; Ga. L. 1962, p. 67, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 407, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 693, § 1.

47-14-77.
Service for which no credit received for retirement purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a clerk may not receive credit for retirement purposes for any service performed as a clerk prior to six months from the time application is made for membership in the fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a clerk may not receive credit for retirement purposes for deputy clerk service or for military service unless such credits are sought at the time of application for membership in the fund.

No member who first or again becomes a member on or after September 1, 2009, and who is subject to the provisions of Code Section 15-6-50 shall be entitled to include, for any purpose under this chapter, service during which he or she was not in compliance with the training requirements of subsection (c) of such Code section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, and except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a clerk who first or again becomes a member of this retirement fund on or after July 1, 2010, shall not be entitled to receive credit for any purpose for prior service as a deputy clerk.

Any person who is serving as chief deputy clerk on July 1, 2010, and who, without a break in service, became the clerk of the same court may receive creditable service for such service as provided in Code Section 47-14-70 by making application to the board of trustees in such manner as the board deems appropriate and paying to the board of trustees an amount determined by the board of trustees to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting such creditable service. Such application and payment shall be made not later than six months after such person became a clerk of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1273, § 2; Code 1981, §

47-14-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1273, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 826, § 1/HB 488; Ga. L. 2010, p. 421, § 1/HB 486.

The 2009 amendment,

effective June 1, 2009, added subsection (c).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added subsection (d).

47-14-78.
Service for which credit received for retirement purposes.

Any member of this retirement system who, prior to becoming a member, served as a clerk of a state court in which the clerk is someone other than the clerk of the superior court shall be entitled to not more than 20 years of creditable service for such prior service. Any such member shall make application to the board in such form and providing such documentation of such prior service as the board deems necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-14-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, § 7.

47-14-79.
Death benefit paid to designated beneficiary of member who dies in service.

A death benefit in the amount of $5,000.00 shall be paid to the designated beneficiary of any member who dies in service. In the absence of a designated beneficiary, such amount shall be paid to the deceased member’s estate. For members eligible for a surviving spouse’s benefit, such amount shall be in addition to the benefit provided pursuant to Code Section 47-14-72.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-14-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 421, § 2/HB 486.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2010.